Hawaii statutes.
[§135-4] Government's immunities. The
State and counties and their respective officers and employees shall not be
liable for the death of, or injury to, persons or for damage to property, as a
result of the use of an owner's real property for the diversion of vehicles,
pedestrians, bicyclists, or a combination thereof, during an emergency or
traffic accident, as provided in section 135-2. [L 1997, c 313, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next